Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1421.01
Foreign national, defined.

Foreign national means:

(1) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States or a national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence;

(2) A person, other than an individual, organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;

(3) A government of a foreign country; or

(4) A political party or political committee established in a foreign country.

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 46.
July 18, 2026